src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_teu/er__adj-positive
+Msc+Sg+Acc+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Dat+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>em # ;!st
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Msc+Sg+Gen+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Nom+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!sw
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!mix

+Msc+Pl+Acc+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!st
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Msc+Pl+Dat+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Gen+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Msc+Pl+Nom+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!st
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix

+Neu+Sg+Acc+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es # ;!mix
+Neu+Sg+Dat+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>em # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Neu+Sg+Gen+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Nom+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>es # ;!mix

+Neu+Pl+Acc+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!st
+Neu+Pl+Acc+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Neu+Pl+Acc+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Neu+Pl+Dat+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Pl+Dat+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Pl+Dat+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Neu+Pl+Gen+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Neu+Pl+Gen+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Neu+Pl+Gen+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Neu+Pl+Nom+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!st
+Neu+Pl+Nom+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Neu+Pl+Nom+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix

+Fem+Sg+Acc+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Dat+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Fem+Sg+Gen+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Fem+Sg+Nom+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!

+Fem+Pl+Acc+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!st
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Fem+Pl+Dat+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Gen+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>er # ;!st
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix
+Fem+Pl+Nom+St:%^Pen%^RmVow%>e # ;!st
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Sw:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Mix:%^Pen%^RmVow%>en # ;!mix

+Attr: # ;
+Pred: # ;



LEXICON A_gewiss__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_gr/oß__adj
!k/urz__adj, schw/arz__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:X1%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:X1%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_h/och__adj
+A: #;
LEXICON A_minde/r__adj !!= * @CODE@ minder:minde
+A+Comp:%>r A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_n/ah__adj !!= * @CODE@ nah:na
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:hX1%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:chX1%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_nämlich__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_schm/al__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:X1%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:X1%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_n/ass__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Comp:X1%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A+Superl:X1%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;



LEXICON Comparisons
+A+pos:0        Cases   ;
+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
