src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
gewiss:gewiss A_gewiss__adj ;
gewiß:gewiß A_gewiss__adj ;
glamourös:glamourös A_gewiss__adj ;
groß:groß A_gr/oß__adj ;
hoch:hoch A_h/och__adj ;
kurz:kurz A_gr/oß__adj ;!A_k/urz__adj ;
minder:minde A_minde/r__adj ; 
muskulös:muskulös A_gewiss__adj ;
nah:na A_n/ah__adj ;
nämlich:nämlich A_nämlich__adj ;
nass:nass A_n/ass__adj ;
prätentiös:prätentiös A_gewiss__adj ;
schmal:schmal A_schm/al__adj ;
schwarz:schwarz A_gr/oß__adj ;!A_schw/arz__adj 
zwecklos:zwecklos A_gewiss__adj ;
